Oklahoma, session 2025, SB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 22-110.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 22-110.1. A. For purposes of promoting commerce and


the equitable treatment of the citizens of this state, the


registration of any real property by any municipality is declared to


be a statewide concern and shall be prohibited pursuant to


subsection B of this section.


B. No municipality shall enact or attempt to enforce through


fees, civil fines or criminal penalties any ordinance, rule or


regulation to require the registration of real property. Any


ordinance, rule or regulation contrary to the provisions of this


section, whether enacted prior to or after August 22, 2014, is

Req. No. 218 Page 1


declared null and void and unenforceable against every owner,


purchaser, assignee, lessee, mortgagee or beneficiary of any


interest in the real property.


C. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a municipality from


creating a list of the property owners or the designees of property


owners of residential, commercial or leased real property to ensure


the public safety and welfare of its citizens.


Additionally, for the purpose of addressing public nuisances,


dilapidated properties or other unlawful conduct in accordance with


their general police powers, municipal governments may require:


1. Contact information of persons or entities responsible for


emergency contracts and property maintenance for property outlined


in this subsection; or


2. The name of a person or entity authorized to receive notice


and service of process for property outlined in this subsection,


along with their contact information.


Municipal governments shall not collect a fee to administer the


collection of information authorized in this section.


D. B. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a municipality


from enacting and enforcing rules and regulations to require real


property owners to comply with the provisions of this section and


established occupancy standards as set forth by ordinance and state


law.



Req. No. 218 Page 2


E. C. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a municipality


from requiring the owner of property that is the subject of any


abatement process provided in this title to provide the name,


physical address and telephone number of an individual to receive


and respond to communications concerning the property subject to the


abatement process. No future action taken by the municipality shall


be rendered ineffective due to the failure of the property owner to


provide the information pursuant to this subsection. The


municipality shall not assess any additional charge when requiring


the information.


F. D. Information obtained by the municipal government under


this section shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure


under the Oklahoma Open Records Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-218 MSBB 12/30/2024 12:29:04 PM

















Req. No. 218 Page 3